Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Use of Net Income of Alaska Heritage Endowment Fund.

Sec. 14.57.100.
Acquisitions.

Subject to appropriation by the legislature under AS

37.14.530

, the director may use the balance of the net income account of the Alaska heritage endowment fund to acquire culturally or historically significant artifacts, natural history specimens, art objects, collections, and other items, materials, or properties that represent and document Alaska’s land, natural history, and people for

the Alaska State Museum; and

the Sheldon Jackson Museum.

History.

(§ 4 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 14.57.110.
Ownership of acquired items.

Except when ownership of an item is transferred under AS

14.57.120

, an item acquired under AS

14.57.100

becomes the property of the state museum.

History.

(§ 4 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 14.57.120.
Criteria applicable to acquisitions from the fund.

Subject to approval given by the Museum Collections Advisory Committee under AS

14.57.050(b)

, the director may

establish by contract the terms and conditions of custody, protection, conservation, and exhibition of an item acquired by the state museum if the item is acquired and custody of it is assigned to another institution;

transfer ownership of an item to an institution having custody of an item acquired from the net income account of the fund if the director is satisfied that the institution will provide necessary care and protection of the item; or

assign long-term custody of an item to an institution having custody of an item acquired from the net income account of the fund if the director is satisfied that the institution to which custody of the item is transferred will provide necessary care and protection of the item in accordance with a contract entered into under (1) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 14.57.130.
Disposition of acquired items.

Subject to approval of the Museum Collections Advisory Committee under AS

14.57.050(b)

, the director may establish a deaccession policy under which the director may exchange or otherwise convey title to an item acquired from the net income account of the fund in accordance with generally accepted principles governing the disposal of these items.

History.

(§ 4 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 14.57.199.
Definitions.

In AS

14.57.100

—

14.57.199

,

“director” means the director of the division of the department that has responsibility for state libraries, archives, and museums;

“fund” means the Alaska heritage endowment fund established in AS

37.14.500

;

“net income account” means the account established in AS

37.14.510

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 82 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (1), added “of the department that has responsibility for” following “the division”, and made a related stylistic change.